ro-RO: Evaluarea rezistenței la lumină a cernelii artistice: ASTM I (excelentă); ASTM II (foarte bună); ASTM III (acceptabilă); ASTM IV (slabă); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Neevaluat; Altele
hu: Művészeti festék fényállósági besorolása: ASTM I (kiváló); ASTM II (nagyon jó); ASTM III (közepes); ASTM IV (gyenge); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Nincs értékelve; Egyéb
cs: Světlostálost uměleckého inkoustu: ASTM I (vynikající); ASTM II (velmi dobrá); ASTM III (dostatečná); ASTM IV (slabá); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Bez hodnocení; Ostatní
da: Farveblæks lysægthed: ASTM I (Fremragende); ASTM II (Meget god); ASTM III (Rimelig); ASTM IV (Dårlig); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Ikke bedømt; Andet
es: Clasificación de resistencia a la luz de la tinta artística: ASTM I (excelente); ASTM II (muy buena); ASTM III (regular); ASTM IV (deficiente); Lana azul 1; Lana azul 2; Lana azul 3; Lana azul 4; Lana azul 5; Lana azul 6; Lana azul 7; Lana azul 8; Sin clasificación; Otra
it: Valutazione della resistenza alla luce degli inchiostri artistici: ASTM I (Eccellente); ASTM II (Molto buona); ASTM III (Discreta); ASTM IV (Scarsa); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Non classificata; Altro
en: Art ink lightfastness rating: ASTM I (Excellent); ASTM II (Very Good); ASTM III (Fair); ASTM IV (Poor); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Not rated; Other
nl: Lichtbestendigheidsclassificatie kunstinkt: ASTM I (uitstekend); ASTM II (zeer goed); ASTM III (matig); ASTM IV (slecht); Blauwe wol-schaal 1; Blauwe wol-schaal 2; Blauwe wol-schaal 3; Blauwe wol-schaal 4; Blauwe wol-schaal 5; Blauwe wol-schaal 6; Blauwe wol-schaal 7; Blauwe wol-schaal 8; Niet geclassificeerd; Overige
sl-SI: Ocena svetlobne obstojnosti črnila za umetniško ustvarjanje: ASTM I (odlično); ASTM II (zelo dobro); ASTM III (zadovoljivo); ASTM IV (slabo); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Ni ocenjeno; Drugo
th: ระดับความคงทนต่อแสงของหมึกศิลปะ: ASTM I (ดีเยี่ยม); ASTM II (ดีมาก); ASTM III (พอใช้); ASTM IV (แย่); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; ไม่ได้จัดระดับ; อื่นๆ
el: Βαθμολογία αντοχής μελανιού στο φως: ASTM I (Άριστο); ASTM II (Πολύ καλό); ASTM III (Μέτριο); ASTM IV (Κακό); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Χωρίς αξιολόγηση; Άλλο
sv: Konstbläckets ljushäkthetsklassificering: ASTM I (Utmärkt); ASTM II (Mycket bra); ASTM III (Acceptabel); ASTM IV (Dålig); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Ej klassificerad; Annat
de: Lichtechtheitsbewertung von Künstlertinte: ASTM I (Hervorragend); ASTM II (Sehr gut); ASTM III (Mittelmäßig); ASTM IV (Gering); Blauwollskala 1; Blauwollskala 2; Blauwollskala 3; Blauwollskala 4; Blauwollskala 5; Blauwollskala 6; Blauwollskala 7; Blauwollskala 8; Nicht bewertet; Sonstige
ko: 미술용 잉크 내광성 등급: ASTM I(우수); ASTM II(매우 좋음); ASTM III(보통); ASTM IV(나쁨); 블루 울 1; 블루 울 2; 블루 울 3; 블루 울 4; 블루 울 5; 블루 울 6; 블루 울 7; 블루 울 8; 등급 없음; 기타
pl: Odporność tuszu artystycznego na światło: ASTM I (doskonała); ASTM II (bardzo dobra); ASTM III (dostateczna); ASTM IV (słaba); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Brak oceny; Inne
ja: アートインクの耐光性評価: ASTM I (極めて優れている); ASTM II (非常に優れている); ASTM III (普通); ASTM IV (劣る); ブルーウール 1; ブルーウール 2; ブルーウール 3; ブルーウール 4; ブルーウール 5; ブルーウール 6; ブルーウール 7; ブルーウール 8; 評価なし; その他
zh-TW: 藝術墨水耐光度等級: ASTM I (極佳); ASTM II (很好); ASTM III (普通); ASTM IV (差); 藍色羊毛標準 1; 藍色羊毛標準 2; 藍色羊毛標準 3; 藍色羊毛標準 4; 藍色羊毛標準 5; 藍色羊毛標準 6; 藍色羊毛標準 7; 藍色羊毛標準 8; 未評級; 其他
lt-LT: Meno rašalo atsparumo šviesai įvertinimas: ASTM I (Puikus); ASTM II (Labai geras); ASTM III (Patenkinamas); ASTM IV (Prastas); „Blue Wool“ 1; „Blue Wool“ 2; „Blue Wool“ 3; „Blue Wool“ 4; „Blue Wool“ 5; „Blue Wool“ 6; „Blue Wool“ 7; „Blue Wool“ 8; Neįvertinta; Kita
pt-BR: Classificação de resistência à luz da tinta artística: ASTM I (excelente); ASTM II (muito boa); ASTM III (razoável); ASTM IV (ruim); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Não classificado; Outro
hr-HR: Ocjena svjetlosne postojanosti umjetničke tinte: ASTM I (Odlično); ASTM II (Vrlo dobro); ASTM III (Prosječno); ASTM IV (Slabo); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Bez ocjene; Ostalo
fr: Indice de résistance à la lumière des encres artistiques: ASTM I (excellent); ASTM II (très bon); ASTM III (passable); ASTM IV (médiocre); Laine bleue 1; Laine bleue 2; Laine bleue 3; Laine bleue 4; Laine bleue 5; Laine bleue 6; Laine bleue 7; Laine bleue 8; Non évalué; Autre
fi: Taidemusteen valonkestoluokitus: ASTM I (Erinomainen); ASTM II (Erittäin hyvä); ASTM III (Kohtalainen); ASTM IV (Huono); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Ei luokiteltu; Muu
bg-BG: Оценка за светлоустойчивост на арт мастилото: ASTM I (отлична); ASTM II (много добра); ASTM III (приемлива); ASTM IV (слаба); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Без оценка; Друго
ru: Светостойкость художественных чернил: ASTM I (отличная); ASTM II (очень хорошая); ASTM III (удовлетворительная); ASTM IV (низкая); Синяя шкала 1; Синяя шкала 2; Синяя шкала 3; Синяя шкала 4; Синяя шкала 5; Синяя шкала 6; Синяя шкала 7; Синяя шкала 8; Без рейтинга; Другое
nb: Lysfasthetsvurdering for kunstblekk: ASTM I (utmerket); ASTM II (veldig god); ASTM III (middels); ASTM IV (dårlig); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Ikke vurdert; Annet
pt-PT: Classificação de resistência à luz da tinta artística: ASTM I (Excelente); ASTM II (Muito bom); ASTM III (Razoável); ASTM IV (Fraco); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Não classificado; Outros
sk-SK: Hodnotenie stálosti umeleckých atramentov na svetle: ASTM I (Vynikajúce); ASTM II (Veľmi dobré); ASTM III (Uspokojivé); ASTM IV (Slabé); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Nehodnotené; Iné
tr: Sanat mürekkebinin ışığa dayanıklılık derecesi: ASTM I (Mükemmel); ASTM II (Çok iyi); ASTM III (Orta); ASTM IV (Zayıf); Mavi Yün 1; Mavi Yün 2; Mavi Yün 3; Mavi Yün 4; Mavi Yün 5; Mavi Yün 6; Mavi Yün 7; Mavi Yün 8; Derecelendirilmemiş; Diğer
zh-CN: 艺术墨水耐光性等级: ASTM I（极佳）; ASTM II（很好）; ASTM III（一般）; ASTM IV（差）; 蓝羊毛标准 1 级; 蓝羊毛标准 2 级; 蓝羊毛标准 3 级; 蓝羊毛标准 4 级; 蓝羊毛标准 5 级; 蓝羊毛标准 6 级; 蓝羊毛标准 7 级; 蓝羊毛标准 8 级; 未评级; 其他
vi: Độ bền màu của mực in nghệ thuật: ASTM I (Xuất sắc); ASTM II (Rất tốt); ASTM III (Khá); ASTM IV (Kém); Blue Wool 1; Blue Wool 2; Blue Wool 3; Blue Wool 4; Blue Wool 5; Blue Wool 6; Blue Wool 7; Blue Wool 8; Không xếp hạng; Khác